Georgia, session 2025_26, HB42.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
22 SECTION 1.
23 Part 5 of Article 6 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
24 relating to program weights and funding requirements under Quality Basic Education, is
25 amended by revising Code Section 20-2-188, relating to student transportation, as follows:
26 "20-2-188.
27 (a)(1) As used in this Code section, the term 'school vehicle,' or 'vehicle,' means vehicles,
28 including, but not limited to school buses, that are designated and used by a local unit of
29 administration for the transportation of students as part of its transportation program;
30 provided, however, that vehicles owned by school personnel, students, or student family
31 members shall not be included even when used for the purpose of transporting students.
32 (2) As used in this chapter, the term:
33 (A) 'Bus' or 'school bus' means vehicles, including, but not limited to school buses, that
34 are designated and used by a local unit of administration for the transportation of
35 students as part of its transportation program; provided, however, that vehicles owned
36 by school personnel, students, or student family members shall not be included even
37 when used for the purpose of transporting students.
38 (B) 'School bus driver' shall mean a person who is assigned by a local unit of
39 administration to drive vehicles, including, but not limited to school buses, that are
40 designated and used by such local unit of administration for the transportation of
41 students as part of its transportation program.
42 (C) 'School bus stop' means a place designated by a local unit of administration or
43 other proper authority for the pickup and drop off of students using vehicles, including,
H. B. 42
- 2 -

25 LC 56 0223
44 but not limited to school buses, designated and used by such local unit of administration
45 for the transportation of students as part of its student transportation program.
46 (a)(b)(1) The Twice each school year, the amount of funds needed by a local unit of
47 administration to pay expenses the projected costs of student transportation shall be
48 calculated and distributed by the State Board of Education in accordance with a schedule
49 of standard transportation costs to be incurred by local units of administration in the
50 operation of economical and efficient student transportation programs and a schedule of
51 variable transportation costs or variable cost factors dependent upon current and
52 prevailing circumstances which affect, in varying ways, the cost of student transportation
53 authorized by this Code section; provided, however, that the amount of funds to be
54 actually distributed to any local unit of administration under this Code section during any
55 school year shall equal the lesser of 100 percent of the projected costs calculated under
56 this Code section for such local unit of administration or not exceed the actual costs
57 incurred by the local unit of administration in transporting students to and from public
58 schools, including costs for transportation for disabled or limited-English-proficient
59 students who must travel across local school system lines or away from the school to
60 which they would normally be assigned if they did not have such special needs. It is
61 further provided that the costs of the regular student transportation program receive full
62 funding before funds are provided for transportation of students to and from places for
63 the purpose of work experiences, training in instructional laboratories outside the
64 assigned schools, and in other such field trips required of or integral to the various
65 instructional components of the educational program. In establishing the schedule of
66 standards and variable student transportation costs or cost factors, the state board State
67 Board of Education shall collaborate with local units of administration throughout the
68 state and is, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, authorized to consider
69 factors and circumstances such as the number and density of students transported in the
70 local unit of administration and the areas therein served by school buses school vehicles;
H. B. 42
- 3 -

25 LC 56 0223
71 the suitability of school bus school vehicle transportation routes in the local unit of
72 administration; the suitability of the type and number of buses school vehicles used by
73 the local unit of administration; the number of miles traveled by school buses such school
74 vehicles in the local unit of administration; minimum bus school vehicle loads;
75 transportation surveys, cost of transportation equipment, and depreciation schedules; the
76 schedule of minimum salaries for school bus vehicle drivers established in accordance
77 with subsection (b)(d) of this Code section; the number of school bus vehicle drivers
78 allotted to the local unit of administration; maintenance, repair, and operating costs of
79 transportation equipment; climate and terrain; condition of roads used for the purpose of
80 transporting students in the local unit of administration; cost of health and liability
81 insurance; cost of safety instruction and training for both bus drivers and students; and
82 such other factors and circumstances as the state board State Board of Education may find
83 relevant for the purpose of establishing such schedules and cost factors. The State Board
84 of Education shall provide for process by which local units of administration shall be
85 permitted to submit for review by the Department of Education information which such
86 local unit of administration deems to be relevant to the calculation of the projected cost
87 of student transportation programs. The state board State Board of Education shall have
88 authority to establish minimum requirements and standards respecting use of funds
89 allotted under this Code section.
90 (2) The schedule of standards and variable student transportation costs or cost factors
91 provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be updated by the Department of
92 Education twice each year no later than March 1 and November 1 to accurately reflect
93 current and actual conditions and published on the Department of Education's public
94 website.
95 (a.1)(c) Any funds that the State Board of Education allocates for school bus vehicle
96 replacement may be used by local boards of education local units of administration to
97 refurbish existing school buses; provided, however, that school. Bus vehicle replacement
H. B. 42
- 4 -

25 LC 56 0223
98 funds may not be restricted by the state board State Board of Education for use only in
99 purchasing new or replacement school buses vehicles. Any school bus vehicle that is
100 refurbished shall be subject to all safety and maintenance inspection requirements provided
101 for by law. Refurbishment of a school bus such school vehicle shall be done by a school
102 bus manufacturer or by a dealer of a manufacturer. Each local board of education local unit
103 of administration that refurbishes a school bus vehicle pursuant to this subsection is
104 strongly encouraged to apply for federal funds to retrofit the engine. The State Board of
105 Education shall notify the Environmental Protection Division when a local board of
106 education local unit of administration receives state funds to refurbish a school bus vehicle
107 so that the division may provide information to such local board unit of administration
108 regarding the availability of federal funds for such purposes.
109 (b)(d) The State Board of Education shall establish a schedule of uniform minimum
110 salaries that shall be paid by local units of administration to drivers of school buses
111 vehicles provided by local units of administration for student transportation, regardless of
112 type of ownership, which shall be not less than the amount appropriated by the General
113 Assembly each year but not less than $500.00 $2,000.00 per month for 12 months. The
114 minimum salary schedule shall not apply to drivers of cars and other vehicles not
115 designated as school buses. Local units of administration shall not pay to any bus such
116 driver in their employment salaries less than those prescribed by the uniform minimum
117 salary schedule but shall have the authority to supplement such salaries. The expense of
118 purchasing, maintaining, and operating such buses school vehicles regardless of type of
119 ownership, shall not be considered in establishing the schedule of uniform minimum
120 salaries for school bus such drivers. The schedule of uniform minimum salaries shall be
121 used as a standard cost item for the purpose of calculating the expense of student
122 transportation under subsection (a)(b) of this Code section. This subsection shall not apply
123 to student or teacher drivers.
H. B. 42
- 5 -

25 LC 56 0223
124 (c)(e) To the extent that the State Board of Education obtains a state-bid price under
125 subsection (b) of Code Section 20-2-168 on any standard item of equipment, supply, or
126 service used or obtained by local units of administration in connection with or as a result
127 of providing transportation services to students attending the public schools of such local
128 units of administration or on any other standard expense incurred by local units of
129 administration, the standard transportation cost or allowance to be attributed to such item
130 or expense under subsection (a)(b) of this Code section shall be based upon an amount not
131 in excess of the state-bid price on such item or expense.
132 (d)(f) Students who live beyond one and one-half miles from the school to which they are
133 assigned, according to the nearest practical route by school bus, vehicle, and students who
134 cannot readily walk to school or otherwise travel to school without the use of a motor
135 vehicle due to safety concerns, including, but not limited to, a lack of safely traversable
136 sidewalks and bike lanes, congested intersections, and otherwise unsafe conditions, shall
137 be eligible to be counted as transported students for the purpose of calculating that portion
138 of the expense of student transportation associated with transporting students from home
139 to school and from school to home as authorized under subsection (a)(b) of this Code
140 section, provided such students are actually transported to such school by a school bus or
141 other vehicle made available for this purpose by the local unit of administration. Any
142 Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any student who resides within such
143 mileage limitation shall not be eligible to be counted for school transportation state-aid
144 purposes, with the exception of disabled students being transported.
145 (e)(g) The State Board of Education shall establish and require adherence to minimum
146 specifications for school vehicles used or contracted to be used by local units of
147 administration for transporting students, including a motor vehicle with a capacity of eight
148 persons or less operated and marked for the transportation of school children to and from
149 school and school related activities, taking into account the factors and circumstances set
150 forth in subsection (a)(b) of this Code section, and shall establish and require adherence to
H. B. 42
- 6 -

25 LC 56 0223
151 minimum standards and requirements respecting maintenance, repair, inspection, and use
152 of such vehicles and minimum qualifications for the drivers of such vehicles. The state
153 board State Board of Education shall require, monitor, and fund a program of safety
154 instruction in the practices of safe riding and emergency bus vehicle evacuation drills for
155 both school bus drivers and students riding school buses vehicles.
156 (f)(h) The State Board of Education shall have the authority to allot funds for the
157 transportation of all public school students residing on Sapelo Island to the mainland of the
158 state for the purpose of attending school on the mainland.
159 (g)(i) The State Board of Education shall adopt policies, procedures, regulations, and other
160 such requirements for transportation and for payment of all transportation costs pursuant
161 to subsections (a) through (e)(g) of this Code section for all students with special needs
162 identified by the various local units of administration. Further, the state board State Board
163 of Education shall allot funds to local units of administration for transportation costs for
164 those students authorized by such local units of administration to attend schools and
165 programs of other local units of administration.
166 (h)(j) The State Board of Education shall adopt policies and regulations relative to vehicles
167 used for the transportation of students with special needs.
168 (i)(k) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) through (h)(j) of this Code section,
169 funds to pay the expenses of student transportation shall be paid to an independent school
170 system only when requested by the board of education of such independent school system.
171 Any funds for student transportation costs shall be specified by the board of education of
172 the independent school system in its budget prepared pursuant to subsection (c) of Code
173 Section 20-2-167 and, if not budgeted therein, no expenses for student transportation shall
174 be payable to the independent school system for the fiscal year covered by such budget.
175 No provision of this article shall be construed to require the board of education of any
176 independent school system to furnish student transportation services within such school
177 system.
H. B. 42
- 7 -

25 LC 56 0223
178 (j)(l) The amount of funds needed by a local unit of administration during a fiscal year for
179 sick and personal leave expenses of drivers of school bus drivers vehicles shall be
180 determined by multiplying the number of school buses vehicles allotted to a local unit of
181 administration pursuant to this Code section by a sum of money not less than $75.00. The
182 State Board of Education shall have the authority to prescribe minimum requirements and
183 standards for the distribution, use, and expenditure of funds allotted under this subsection."
184 SECTION 2.
185 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 42
- 8 -